pl: Typ końcówki do bastera: Pędzel do smarowania; Igła wtryskiwacza; Końcówka rozprowadzająca; Standard; Pozostałe
bg-BG: Тип накрайник за кухненска пипета: Четка за намазване; Игла за инжектиране; Инструмент за намазване; Стандартно; Друго
it: Tipo di punte per siringa: Spazzola per grasso; Ago dell'iniettore; Concimatrice; Standard; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de vârf al pipetei: Pensulă de uns; Ac de injectare; Cu vârf pentru întins; Standard; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta konice pipete: Čopič za peko; Igla za injektor; Trosilnik; Standardna; Druga
zh-TW: 滴管吸嘴類型: 醬料刷; 注射針; 抹刀; 標準; 其他
de: Spitzentyp für Bratenspritze: Backpinsel; Injektionsnadel; Verstreuer; Standard; Sonstiges
cs: Typ špičky stříkačky na podlévání: Kuchyňský štětec/mašlovačka; Vstřikovací jehla; Rozmetadlo; Standardní; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de ponta da seringa de regar: Pincel para assados; Agulha injetora; Espalhador; Padrão; Outro
fr: Type d’embout de la poire à jus: Pinceau à badigeonner; Aiguille d’injection; Épandeur; Standard; Autre
tr: Baster uç tipi: Yumurta fırçası; Enjektör ucu; Sürme; Standart; Diğer
ko: 베이스터 팁 유형: 배스팅 브러시; 주사 바늘; 살포기; 표준; 기타
sv: Typ av basterspets: Marinadpensel; Sprutnål; Spridare; Standard; Övrigt
es: Tipo de punta de pipeta para salsas: Pincel de cocina; Aguja inyectora; Esparcidor; Estándar; Otros
sk-SK: Typ hrotu injektora Baster: Maslovačka; Ihla vstrekovača; Rozmetadlo; Štandardný; Iné
da: Stegesprøjtes spidstype: Køkkenpensel; Injektionsnål; Spreder; Standard; Andet
en: Baster tip type: Basting brush; Injector needle; Spreader; Standard; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de ponta da pipeta conta-gotas: Pincel para untar; Agulha injetora; Espátula; Padrão; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta vrha pipete za nadjev: Kist za nadjev; Igla injektora; Podrška za stativ; Standardni; Ostalo
vi: Loại đầu dụng cụ phết: Cọ phết dầu, gia vị; Kim tiêm gia vị; Máy rắc; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
fi: Paistinruiskun kärjen tyyppi: Sivellinkärki; Ruiskutusneula; Levityspää; Tavallinen; Muu
ja: ベイスター先端の種類: はけ; 注入針; スプレッダー; スタンダード; その他
el: Τύπος μύτης σύριγγας μαγειρικής: Πινέλο επάλειψης; Βελόνα έγχυσης; Εργαλείο απλώματος; Κανονικό; Άλλο
nl: Soort mondstuk: Bakkwast; Injectienaald; Verdeler; Standaard; Overig
zh-CN: 刷油器喷嘴类型: 涂抹刷头; 注射针; 扩散刷头; 标准刷头; 其他
hu: Húslocsoló fej típusa: Kenőecset; Injekciós tű; Szórófej; Normál; Egyéb
nb: Stekepipett-type: Marinadepensel; Injektornål; Spreder; Standard; Annet
ru: Тип наконечника шприца: Насадка-кисточка; Инъекционная игла; Лопатка-распределитель; Стандартный; Другое
lt-LT: Laistymo švirkšto antgalio tipas: Bastingo šepetėlis; Injekcinė adata; Barstytuvas; Standartinis; Kita
th: ประเภทหัวดูดของเหลว: แปรงทาซอส; แบบหัวเข็มฉีด; แปรงเกลี่ยซอส; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ